North Dakota, session 69, HB1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 6-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Higher education infrastructure revolving loan fund - Continuing appropriation.
1. The higher education infrastructure revolving loan fund is a special fund in the state
treasury from which the Bank of North Dakota shall provide loans to institutions under
the control of the state board of higher education for auxiliary enterprise infrastructure
projects. The Bank shall administer the higher education infrastructure revolving loan
fund. The maximum term of a loan made under this section is the lesser of twenty
years or the useful life of the project. A loan made from the fund under this section
must have an interest rate that does not exceed three and one - half percent per year .
2. For purposes of this section, "auxiliary enterprise infrastructure projects" means capital
construction projects to construct new infrastructure or replace or renovate existing
infrastructure, for student housing, student dining, and centralized campus heating.
3. In processing institution loan applications under this section, the Bank shall calculate
the maximum outstanding loan amount per qualified applicant. A qualified applicant
under this section may have no more than a maximum combined total of ten million
dollars in outstanding loans under this section. The Bank shall consider the applicant's
ability to repay the loan when processing the application and shall issue loans only to
Page No. 1 25.0317.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
applicants that provide reasonable assurance of sufficient future income to repay the
loan.
4. The Bank shall deposit in the higher education infrastructure revolving loan fund all
payments of interest and principal paid under loans made from the higher education
infrastructure revolving loan fund. The Bank may use a portion of the interest paid on
the outstanding loans as a servicing fee to pay for administrative costs which may not
exceed one - half of one percent of the amount of the interest payment. All moneys
transferred to the fund, interest upon moneys in the fund, and payments to the fund of
principal and interest are appropriated to the Bank on a continuing basis for
administrative costs and for loan disbursement according to this section.
5. The Bank may adopt policies and establish guidelines to administer this loan program
in accordance with the provisions of this section and to supplement and leverage the
funds in the higher education infrastructure revolving loan fund. Additionally, the Bank
may adopt policies allowing participation by local financial institutions.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - TRANSFER - HIGHER EDUCATION
INFRASTRUCTURE REVOLVING LOAN FUND - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT -
ONE-TIME FUNDING.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $25,000,000, which the office of management and
budget shall transfer to the higher education infrastructure revolving loan fund during
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. This appropriation is
considered a one-time funding item.
2. The North Dakota university system shall provide a report to the legislative
management by September 1, 2026, regarding the status of the loan fund and any
financial benefits realized by students attending institutions of higher learning utilizing
the higher education infrastructure revolving loan fund.
Page No. 2 25.0317.03000